Washington statutes.
RCW 2.53.055

Kinship care legal aid coordinator.

(1) Subject to amounts specifically appropriated for this purpose, the role of kinship care legal aid coordinator is hereby created at the office of civil legal aid. The office may contract with a separate nonprofit legal aid organization to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(2)(a) The kinship care legal aid coordinator shall consult with the following entities:

(i) The kinship care oversight committee as provided for in RCW 74.13.621;

(ii) The Washington state supreme court access to justice board's pro bono council;

(iii) The Washington state bar association moderate means program;

(iv) The department of social and health services, aging and long-term support administration; and

(v) The office of public defense.

(b) The kinship care legal aid coordinator shall work with entities stated in (a) of this subsection to identify and facilitate the development of local and regional kinship care legal aid initiatives, and further efforts to implement relevant recommendations from the kinship care oversight committee as provided for in RCW 74.13.621.

(3) The kinship care legal aid coordinator shall maintain the following duties:

(a) Develop, expand, and deliver training materials designed to help pro bono and low bono attorneys provide legal advice and assistance to kinship caregivers on matters that relate to their ability to meet physical, mental, social, educational, and other needs of children and youth in their care;

(b) Produce a biennial report outlining activities undertaken by the coordinator; legal aid resources developed at the statewide, regional, and local levels; and other information regarding development and expansion of legal aid services to kinship caregivers in Washington state. Reports are due to the department of children, youth, and families, department of social and health services, and relevant standing committees of the legislature by December 1st of each even-numbered year.

[ 2019 c 465 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 465: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2019." [ 2019 c 465 s 4.]